Hawaii, session 2026, SB1269.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that geothermal resources can provide stable power and community benefits and are a viable alternative to biofuels.  In 2024, the legislature appropriated $6,000,000 for an integrated geothermal development plan to be administered by the Hawaii technology development corporation under the department of business, economic development, and tourism.  The governor subsequently reduced the appropriation to $3,000,000.  Through a partnership with the University of Hawaii, the Hawaii technology development corporation has already begun work on an integrated geothermal development roadmap with the concrete goal of developing the first utility scale 50- to 100-megawatt power station on Hawaii island. The department of business, economic development and tourism is the appropriate department to guide the continued exploration and identification of geothermal resources in the State.  Geoscience research absent the commercial lens necessary for strategic development and investment is likely to lead to less effective outcomes for commercial viability and will either duplicate existing research or result in a lack of investor confidence.  Further development that is not informed by quality and focused research can create additional risk and lead to decreasing future investments, including the development of a fully commissioned geothermal power station in the State. Hawaii island holds the most promise for the development of the State's first utility-scale geothermal production facility.  All geothermal testing performed in the State confirms that the largest and most reliable source of geothermal energy is located on Hawaii island.  Hawaii island is also the only island that has sufficient agricultural and pastoral land to meet the State's need to achieve food self-sufficiency and security in the future. The legislature recognizes that restoring the original level of funding and additional moneys are needed to allow the Hawaii technology development corporation to continue the geoscience exploration currently underway, including developing an overall development plan and extensive community outreach program, as well as, where possible, building on previous investigations by the department of Hawaiian home lands and other previous publicly available reports and existing exploration data for Hawaii island, either as a result of geothermal resource investigations or byproducts from other exploration and studies (for example, water exploration). Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for the continued exploration and identification of geothermal resources and commercial viability for utility-scale geothermal production in counties with a population of less than three hundred thousand. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $6,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the continued exploration and identification of geothermal resources and commercial viability for utility-scale geothermal production in counties with a population of less than three hundred thousand. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of business, economic development, and tourism for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________